Hawaii statutes.
§11-334 Time for candidate committee
to file preliminary, final, and supplemental reports. (a) The candidate
and treasurer of the candidate committee of each candidate whose name will
appear on the ballot in the immediately succeeding election shall file
preliminary, final, and supplemental reports.

(1) The filing dates for preliminary reports are:

(A) Thirty calendar days prior to a primary
election;

(B) Ten calendar days prior to a primary, each
special, or each nonpartisan election; and

(C) Ten calendar days prior to a general
election; provided that this preliminary report does not need to be filed by a
candidate who is unsuccessful in a primary, special, or nonpartisan election,
or a candidate who is elected to office in the primary, initial special, or
initial nonpartisan election.

The preliminary report filed by the date required
under subparagraph (A) shall be current through June 30, and all other
preliminary reports shall be current through the fifth calendar day before the
filing deadline of those other preliminary reports.

(2) The filing date for the final primary report is
twenty calendar days after a primary, initial special, or initial nonpartisan
election. The report shall be current through the day of the applicable
election.

(3) The filing date for the final election period
report is thirty calendar days after a general, subsequent, subsequent special,
or subsequent nonpartisan election. The report shall be current through the
day of the applicable election. The final election period report shall be
filed by a candidate who is unsuccessful in a primary, initial special, or
initial nonpartisan election or a candidate who is elected to office in the
primary, initial special, or initial nonpartisan election.

(4) The filing dates for supplemental reports are:

(A) January 31 after an election year; and

(B) July 31 after an election year.

The report shall be current through December 31
for the report filed on January 31 and current through June 30 for the report
filed on July 31.

(b) A candidate and treasurer of the candidate
committee of each candidate with a deficit or surplus whose name will not
appear on the ballot in the immediately succeeding election shall file a
supplemental report every six months on January 31 and July 31 until:

(1) The candidate's name appears on the ballot and
then is subject to the reporting requirements in subsection (a); or

(2) The committee's registration is terminated as
provided in section 11-326.

The report shall be current through December 31
for the report filed on January 31 and current through June 30 for the report
filed on July 31.

(c) A candidate and treasurer of the candidate
committee of each candidate shall continue to file all required reports until
the committee's registration is terminated as provided in section 11-326. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 118, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next